Utah statutes.
63A-9-807.   Charges and fees assessed for surplus property.
(1)  The division may assess charges and fees for the acquisition,
warehousing, distribution, or transfer of any property of the United States
for educational, public health, or civil defense purposes, including research,
only if those charges and fees are reasonably related to the division's care
and handling costs of acquiring, receipting, warehousing, distributing, or
transferring the property.
(2)  The division may reduce or eliminate charges on property that is found
not to be usable for the purpose for which it was procured.
(3)  The division shall limit the charges and fees assessed against real
property to the reasonable administrative costs that the division incurred in
effecting transfer.
